Hawaii statutes.
§435E-2 Cooperative indemnity.
Physicians and surgeons may, any other law to the contrary notwithstanding,
form cooperative corporations for the purposes of this chapter. The members of
a cooperative corporation, which shall be limited to physicians and surgeons
only, may enter into unincorporated interindemnity or reciprocal contracts
among themselves; provided that such contracts indemnify solely in respect to
medical malpractice claims against such members, and do not collect in advance
of loss any moneys other than contributions by each member to a collective
reserve trust fund or for necessary expenses of administration. In addition,
each such interindemnity, reciprocal, or interinsurance contract shall meet the
requirements of this chapter. [L 1977, c 182, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next